Vermont, session 2025-2026, H928.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 10 V.S.A. § 4502 is amended to read:
§ 4502. UNIFORM POINT SYSTEM; REVOCATION OF LICENSE
(a) A uniform point system that assigns points to those convicted of a
violation of a provision of this part is established. The conviction report from
the court shall be prima facie evidence of the points assessed. In addition to
other penalties assessed for violation of fish and wildlife statutes, the
Commissioner shall suspend licenses issued under this part that are held by a
person who has accumulated 10 or more points in accordance with the
provisions of subsection (c) of this section.
(b) A person violating provisions of this part shall receive points for
convictions in accordance with the following schedule (all sections are in this
title of the Vermont Statutes Annotated):
(1) Except for biological collection violations determined to be nonpoint
violations under the rules of the Board, five points shall be assessed for any
violation of statutes or rules adopted under this part except those listed in
subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection.
(2) Ten points shall be assessed for:
* * *
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 2 of 8
2026
(G) § 4704. Use of machine guns, and autoloading rifles, and gun
suppressors
(H) § 4705. Shooting from motor vehicles or aircraft, excluding
§ 4705(a)
* * *
(GG) Appendix § 44. Trapping, except for violations of Appendix
§ 44, sections 4.3, 4.4, 4.6, 4.9, 4.10, 4.11, 4.12, 4.14(c) 4.18(b), and 4.14(e)
4.18(e)
(HH) § 4827. Taking black bear doing damage
(II) Appendix § 37, section 10 sections 4.1, 7.5, 8.5, 11.0, 11.1, 11.2,
11.3, 11.4, 11.5, 13.0, and 13.1. Deer management rule
* * *
(OO) Appendix § 22a. Taking turkey doing damage
(PP) Appendix § 35. Taking moose doing damage
* * *
(SS) Appendix § 37, section 9.0. Feeding deer [Repealed.]
(TT) § 4716. Participating in a coyote-hunting competition
(UU) Appendix § 22, sections 6.2, 8.0, 8.1, 8.2, 8.3, 8.4, and 8.5.
Turkey seasons
(VV) Appendix § 33, section 12. Moose management rule
(WW) Appendix § 5. Bow and arrow standards
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 3 of 8
2026
(XX) § 4701. Use of gun, bow and arrow, and crossbow; legal day;
dogs.
(3) Twenty points shall be assessed for:
* * *
(E) § 4702. Use of light (firearm or, muzzleloader, air bow or rifle,
bow, or crossbow involved)
* * *
(O) Appendix § 7, sections 4.0, 4.1, 4.2, 5.3, 6.1, 6.2, 6.3(b), 6.3(d),
6.3(e), 7.1, 7.2, 7.3, and 7.4, and 8.2. Bear, unauthorized taking management
rule
(P) Appendix § 22, sections 4.1, 4.2, 4.3, 4.4, 5.1, 5.2, 5.4, 6.4, and
6.5. Turkey season, excluding: requirements for youth turkey hunting season;
and size of shot used or possessed seasons
(Q) Appendix § 33, section 13.7. Moose management rule
(R) Appendix § 31 (d), (e), and (f). Seasons, bag limits for caribou,
elk, and moose
(S) Appendix § 116. Atlantic salmon in the Connecticut River
(T) § 4521. Failure to stop
(U) Appendix § 37, sections 5.1, 6.1, 6.2, 7.1, 7.2, 7.4, 8.1, 8.2, 8.4,
9.1, 9.2, 9.4, 9.5, 12.2, and 14. Deer management rule, excluding requirements
for youth deer hunting weekend; requirements for novice season; limitations
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 4 of 8
2026
on feeding of deer; reporting big game; and section 11.0, ban of urine and
other natural lures
* * *
(EE) § 4705(a). Shooting from a motor vehicle or other motor-
propelled craft.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 4263 is amended to read:
§ 4263. EXPIRATION; NONTRANSFERABILITY
Licenses shall not be transferable and shall be dated when issued. Annual
licenses shall be valid from January 1 of the calendar year for which they are
issued or from the day of purchase and issue in that year as certified by the
issuing agent. All annual licenses shall expire on December 31 of the year for
which they were issued or 365 days after the date on which they are issued, as
determined by the Commissioner. Term licenses shall be valid only for the
time period certified on the license form by the issuing agent. Any licenses
may be sold prior to the date that they are to become effective.
Sec. 3. 10 V.S.A. § 4255 is amended to read:
§ 4255. LICENSE FEES
(a) Vermont residents may apply for licenses on forms provided by the
Commissioner. Fees for each license shall be:
(1) Fishing license $28.00
(2) Hunting license $28.00
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 5 of 8
2026
(3) Combination hunting and fishing license $47.00
(4) Big game licenses (all require a hunting license)
(A) archery license $23.00
(B) muzzle loader license $23.00
(C) turkey license $23.00
(D) [Repealed.]
(E) [Repealed.]
(F) moose license $100.00
(G) bear tag $5.00
(H) additional deer archery tag $23.00
(5) Trapping license $23.00
(6) Hunting license for persons 17 years of age or under $8.00
(7) Trapping license for persons 17 years of age or under $10.00
(8) Fishing license for persons 15 through 17 years of age $8.00
(9) Super sport license $150.00
(10) Three-day fishing license $11.00
(11) Combination hunting and fishing license for persons 17 years of
age or under $12.00
(12) Mentored hunting license $10.00
* * *
(o) If the Board determines that it is necessary to issue or require additional
big game tags or big game permits that are not otherwise identified in this
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 6 of 8
2026
section, the Department may issue such tags and permits and may assess a
provisional fee for such tags and permits at an amount equal or similar to the
fee for the same big game. The Department shall seek legislative approval of
the provisional fee pursuant to 32 V.S.A. § 603 within one year following the
Department’s assessment of the fee. The Department’s failure to obtain
legislative approval of the provisional fee shall void the provisional fee and the
Department shall not assess a new provisional fee for the same big game tag or
big game permit.
(p) The Commissioner may assess the following fees for the use of
Department of Fish and Wildlife lands and facilities. All fees or charges
collected for the use of Department of Fish and Wildlife lands and facilities
shall be deposited in the Fish and Wildlife Fund:
(1) Rental of the Edward F. Kehoe Education Center:
(A) Partnering organizations and municipalities:
(i) Education Center day use (per day for use of all facilities):
$300.00
(ii) Damage deposit (refundable if all requirements are met):
$150.00 per rental
(iii) Cabin rental (rate is for four persons, $5.00 per additional
person): $60.00 per night
(B) School groups (K–12) day use: $5.00 per student
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 7 of 8
2026
(C) Private entity: Education Center day use (per day for use of all
facilities): $600.00
(D) Weddings: $5,000.00, or $4,000.00 if
a certified wedding planner
is used for the event
(2) Rental of Buck Lake Conservation Camp:
(A) Partnering organizations and municipalities:
(i) Education Center day use (per day/all facilities): $300.00
(ii) Damage deposit (refundable if all requirements met):
$150.00 per rental
(B) Private entity:
(i) Education Center day use (per day/all facilities): $600.00
(ii) Cabin rentals (rate is for four persons, $5.00 per additional
person): $60.00 per night
(3) Controlled waterfowl hunt (Dead Creek Wildlife Management Area
or Mud Creek Wildlife Management Area): $10.00 per person
(4) Meeting rooms:
(A) Grand Isle Fish Culture Station: $25.00 per day
(B) Gordon Center Training Facility, overnight accommodations:
$25.00 per person per night
(5) Special use permit: $50.00 minimum–$10,000.00 maximum
(6) License: $50.00 minimum–$10,000.00 maximum
VT LEG #390251 v.1

No. 159 Page 8 of 8
2026
Sec. 4. 1999 Acts and Resolves No. 1, Sec. 87a is amended to read:
Sec. 87a. GENERAL FUND APPROPRIATIONS
The following amounts are appropriated in fiscal year 1999 to the secretary
of administration, for transfer and use by the referenced departments as
indicated:
(A) To the Vermont housing and conservation board for Champion
land acquisition and affordable housing $5,500,000
* * *
(ii) With respect to lands commonly referred to as the Champion
lands, the agency of natural resources, in a manner consistent with other
statutory obligations and authority, shall:
* * *
(II) Plan and Involve the Community. Involve Vermont
citizens and municipalities in when developing and updating every 10 years a
the long-term comprehensive plan for management of portions of the lands
which are transferred to it.
* * *
Sec. 5. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
Date Governor signed bill: June 17, 2026
VT LEG #390251 v.1